Maryland, session 2025, SB0058.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
SUBTITLE 18. PARENTAL SCHOOL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE ACT.
3–1801.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0058*

SENATE BILL 58
(B) “CHILD” MEANS A BIOLOGICAL CHILD, AN ADOPTED CHILD, A FOSTER
CHILD, A STEPCHILD, OR A LEGAL WARD OF AN EMPLOYEE WHO IS ENROLLED IN A
SCHOOL.
(C) (1) “EMPLOYER” MEANS A PERSON THAT EMPLOYS AT LEAST 50
INDIVIDUALS IN THE STATE.
(2) “EMPLOYER” INCLUDES A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT.
(D) “PARENTAL SCHOOL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE” MEANS LEAVE AWAY FROM
WORK THAT IS PROVIDED BY AN EMPLOYER UNDER § 3–1803 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) “SCHOOL” MEANS AN ELEMENTARY OR A SECONDARY PUBLIC OR
NONPUBLIC SCHOOL THAT IS LOCATED IN THE STATE OR A STATE THAT SHARES A
COMMON BOUNDARY WITH THE STATE.
(F) “SCHOOL ADMINISTRATOR” MEANS THE PRINCIPAL OR A SIMILAR
ADMINISTRATOR WHO IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE OPERATIONS OF A SCHOOL.
3–1802.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT OR OTHERWISE AFFECT
ANY OTHER LAW, EMPLOYER POLICY, OR COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT
THAT PROVIDES FOR PARENTAL SCHOOL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE BENEFITS THAT ARE
MORE GENEROUS THAN REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
3–1803.
(A) AN EMPLOYER SHALL PROVIDE AN EMPLOYEE WITH AT LEAST 12 HOURS
OF PAID PARENTAL SCHOOL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE EACH SCHOOL YEAR IF THE
EMPLOYEE:
(1) HAS BEEN EMPLOYED BY THE EMPLOYER FOR AT LEAST 6
CONSECUTIVE MONTHS; AND
(2) HAS WORKED AN AVERAGE NUMBER OF HOURS PER WEEK IN A
POSITION EQUAL TO AT LEAST 50% OF THE FULL–TIME EQUIVALENT AMOUNT
REQUIRED FOR THE POSITION, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE EMPLOYER’S POLICY OR
PRACTICES OR A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT.
(B) (1) AN EMPLOYEE MAY USE PARENTAL SCHOOL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE
TO ATTEND SCHOOL MEETINGS AND CONFERENCES FOR THE EMPLOYEE’S CHILD.

SENATE BILL 58 3
(2) PARENTAL SCHOOL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE SHALL BE:
(I) PAID AT THE REGULAR RATE OF PAY EARNED BY THE
EMPLOYEE; AND
(II) SEPARATE FROM ANY OTHER LEAVE BENEFITS PROVIDED
BY THE EMPLOYER.
(3) AN EMPLOYER MAY NOT REQUIRE AN EMPLOYEE TO EXHAUST ANY
OTHER LEAVE BENEFITS BEFORE USING PARENTAL SCHOOL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE.
(4) AN EMPLOYER IS NOT REQUIRED TO PAY OUT ON THE
TERMINATION OF EMPLOYMENT UNUSED PARENTAL SCHOOL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE.
(5) AN EMPLOYER MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO ALLOW AN EMPLOYEE
TO USE MORE THAN 4 HOURS OF PARENTAL SCHOOL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE AT A TIME.
(6) AN EMPLOYEE MAY NOT CARRY OVER UNUSED PARENTAL SCHOOL
ENGAGEMENT LEAVE TO THE FOLLOWING SCHOOL YEAR.
(C) (1) IF THE NEED TO USE PARENTAL SCHOOL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE IS
FORESEEABLE, AN EMPLOYEE SHALL PROVIDE TO THE EMPLOYER A WRITTEN
REQUEST TO TAKE THE PARENTAL SCHOOL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE AT LEAST 4
CALENDAR DAYS BEFORE THE DATE OF THE SCHOOL MEETING OR CONFERENCE.
(2) IF THE NEED TO USE PARENTAL SCHOOL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE IS
UNFORESEEABLE, AN EMPLOYEE SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE NOTICE TO AN EMPLOYER AS SOON AS
PRACTICABLE; AND
(II) GENERALLY COMPLY WITH THE EMPLOYER’S NOTICE OR
PROCEDURAL REQUIREMENTS FOR REQUESTING OR REPORTING OTHER LEAVE, IF
THOSE REQUIREMENTS DO NOT INTERFERE WITH THE EMPLOYEE’S ABILITY TO USE
PARENTAL SCHOOL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE.
(3) AN EMPLOYER MAY DENY A REQUEST TO USE PARENTAL SCHOOL
ENGAGEMENT LEAVE IF:
(I) 1. AN EMPLOYEE FAILS TO PROVIDE THE NOTICE
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND

SENATE BILL 58
2. THE EMPLOYEE’S ABSENCE WILL CAUSE A
DISRUPTION TO THE EMPLOYER; OR
(II) GRANTING THE LEAVE REQUEST WOULD CAUSE MORE THAN
5% OF THE EMPLOYER’S TOTAL WORKFORCE OR WORKFORCE SHIFT, WHICHEVER IS
APPLICABLE, TO TAKE PARENTAL SCHOOL ENGAGEMENT LEAVE AT THE SAME TIME.
(D) (1) ON REQUEST BY AN EMPLOYEE WHO USES PARENTAL SCHOOL
ENGAGEMENT LEAVE TO ATTEND A SCHOOL MEETING OR CONFERENCE, A SCHOOL
ADMINISTRATOR SHALL PROVIDE TO THE EMPLOYEE DOCUMENTATION THAT
INDICATES THE EXACT TIME AND DATE OF THE MEETING OR CONFERENCE.
(2) TO BE CONSIDERED A VALID USE OF PARENTAL SCHOOL
ENGAGEMENT LEAVE THAT IS NOT SUBJECT TO ADVERSE ACTION UNDER AN
EMPLOYER POLICY, AN EMPLOYEE SHALL SUBMIT TO THE EMPLOYER THE
DOCUMENTATION OBTAINED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION WITHIN
2 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE MEETING OR CONFERENCE OCCURS.
(3) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS AND THE
COMMISSIONER JOINTLY SHALL DEVELOP AND MAKE AVAILABLE A MODEL
DOCUMENT THAT MAY BE USED TO SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
3–1804.
IF AN EMPLOYER FAILS TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSION MAY ASSESS THE EMPLOYER A CIVIL PENALTY NOT
EXCEEDING $100 FOR EACH EMPLOYEE WITH RESPECT TO WHICH THE EMPLOYER IS
NOT IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
3–1805.
(A) FOR SCHOOLS LOCATED IN THE STATE, THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT
OF SCHOOLS SHALL NOTIFY THE SCHOOL ADMINISTRATORS, PARENTS, AND
GUARDIANS OF THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL:
(1) NOTIFY EMPLOYERS OF THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE;
AND
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 58 5
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.